Utah statutes.
4-4-3.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Addled" or "white rot" means putrid or rotten.

(2)  "Adherent yolk" means the yolk has settled to one side and become fastened to the shell.

(3)  "Black rot" means the egg has deteriorated to such an extent that the whole interior presents a blackened appearance.

(4)  "Black spot" means mould or bacteria have developed in isolated areas inside the shell.

(5)  "Blood ring" means bacteria have developed to such an extent that blood is formed.

(6)  "Candling" means the act of determining the condition of an egg by holding it before a strong light in such a way that it shines through the egg and reveals its contents.

(7)  "Mouldy" means mould spores have formed within the shell.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1979 General Session

